Hawaii statutes.
§54-58 Accounts, revenues, and
expenditures. The board of water supply shall maintain proper accounts in
such manner as to show the true and complete financial status and the results
of management and operation. The accounts shall be kept so as to show all
costs of maintenance, extension, and improvement, all operating expenses, all
expenses of the board, and the amounts paid or set aside for depreciation,
insurance, pensions, interest, sinking funds, and reserves.

All revenues or moneys derived from the
waterworks or otherwise appropriated for the board, other than funds derived
from the sale of bonds, and excepting moneys appropriated by Act 5 of the
Special Session Laws of 1950 for the construction of a water system for the
districts of North and South Kona, shall be paid into the treasury of the
county and maintained by the treasurer in a waterworks fund. The funds shall
be expended for the following purposes:

(1) For payment of interest and sinking fund on all
bonds issued for the acquisition or construction of waterworks and extensions
thereto;

(2) For the payment of the operating and maintenance
expenses of the waterworks, repairs, replacements, additions, and extensions;

(3) For accident reserve, pension charges, and
compensation and insurance;

(4) For purchase or development of new sources of
water; and

(5) For a reserve fund. [L 1949, c 86, §9; am L 1951,
c 171, §1(2); RL 1955, §146-107; HRS §54-58]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next